California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) Prior to acquiring an easement or other interest in land pursuant to this division, a public hearing shall be held by the donee, if the donee is a public agency, or by the board if the donee is a designated nonprofit organization, in the local community. Notice shall be given by the donee or the board to the county board of supervisors of the affected county, adjacent landowners, affected water districts, local municipalities, and other interested parties, as determined by the donee or the board.

(e) When submitting a donation of qualified property to the board for final approval, the donee shall provide the board with the fair market value of the property proposed for acceptance, based on appraisals that have been reviewed and approved by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37013.

The board shall provide a list to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner determined by the Franchise Tax Board, of the names, taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, a legal description of the donated property, and the total amount of the tax credit approved for each donation.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37014.

Assets received by a donee pursuant to this division shall not be deemed transfers pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2780) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code. Funds from the Habitat Conservation Fund, the Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund created pursuant to Section 164.56 of the Streets and Highways Code, the State Parks and Recreation Fund, and the Wildlife Restoration Fund, may not be used to fund the tax credit authorized pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Criteria for Acceptance of Property [37015. - 37016.]

37015.

The board shall approve only contributions of properties that meet one or more of the following criteria:

(a) The property will help meet the goals of a habitat conservation plan, multispecies conservation plan, natural community conservation plan, or any other similar plan subsequently authorized by statute that is designed to benefit native species of plants, including, but not limited to, protecting forests, old growth trees, or oak woodlands, and animals and development. In proposing and approving the acceptance of contributed property pursuant to this subdivision, the recovery benefits for listed species, the habitat value of the property, the value of the property as a wildlife corridor, and similar habitat-related considerations shall be the criteria on which the acceptance is based.

(b) The property will provide corridors or reserves for native plants and wildlife that will help improve the recovery possibilities of listed species and increase the chances that the species will recover sufficiently to be eligible to be removed from the list, or will help avoid the listing of species pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or protect wetlands, waterfowl habitat, or river or stream corridors, or promote the biological viability of important California species.

(c) The property interest is a perpetual conservation easement over agricultural land, or is a permanent contribution of agricultural land, that is threatened by development and is located in an unincorporated area certified by the secretary to be zoned for agricultural use by the county. Property accepted pursuant to this subdivision shall be accepted pursuant to the California Farmland Conservancy Program Act established by Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200), pursuant to the agricultural conservation program of the Coastal Conservancy, or pursuant to the Bay Area Conservancy Program established pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21.

(d) (1) The property interest is a water right, or land with an associated water right, and the contribution of the property will help improve the chances of recovery of a listed species, will reduce the likelihood that any species of fish or other aquatic organism will be listed pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code)) or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), will improve the protection of listed species, or will improve the viability and health of fish species of economic importance to the state. The donee receiving the water right, or land with an associated water right, shall ensure that it shall retain title to the water right, and that the water shall be used to fulfill the purposes for which the water right or land associated with a water right is being accepted.

(2) Any contribution of a water right that includes a change in the point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use may be made only if the proposed change will not injure any legal user of the water involved and is made in accordance with either Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700), or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725), of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Water Code.

(e) The property will be used as a park or open space or will augment public access to or enjoyment of existing regional or local park, beach, or open-space facilities, or will preserve archaeological resources.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37016.

(a) The board shall grant approval of a proposed contribution of property under the program only upon a determination that:

(1) (A) The donation of property satisfies the requirements for a qualified contribution pursuant to Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code. If only a portion (either an undivided fractional interest in the entire property or one or more discrete parcels) of a proposed conveyance of property satisfies the requirements of Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or if the property is sold for less than fair market value, only that portion, or the amount representing the difference between the amount paid by the donee and the fair market value, shall be eligible
 for the tax credit, to the extent permitted by Section 170(h) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The board may segregate eligible and ineligible interests in property proposed to be contributed pursuant to this division. The donor shall receive no other valuable consideration for the donation of property subject to the tax credit.

(B) For purposes of this division, if the property is proposed to be donated to satisfy a condition imposed upon the donor by any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use issued by one or more public agencies, including, but not limited to, the mitigation of significant effects on the environment of a project pursuant to an approved environmental impact report or mitigated negative declaration required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), that property shall not qualify for the credit provided in Section 17053.30 or 23630 of
 the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) There has been no release or threatened release of a hazardous material on the property, unless all of the following occur:

(A) A final remedy in response to the release has been approved by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100)
 or Chapter 6.86 (commencing with Section 25396) of Division 20 of, or Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of, the Health and Safety Code, or the appropriate California regional water quality control board pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The donor or donee have agreed to implement the final remedy approved pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(C) The donor or donee have agreed to fund and have made adequate funding available to pay for the response action, as defined by Section 78140 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a donation of property containing hazardous materials may be accepted under the program without satisfying the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the donee determines, based on written findings from the Department of Toxic Substances Control and the California regional water quality control board with jurisdiction over the property, that the hazardous materials present will pose no substantial risk to human health or the environment and no substantial risk of liability on the donee under the conditions under which the property will be used. The Department of Toxic Substances Control and the California regional water quality control board with
 jurisdiction over the property shall carry out their normal due diligence when developing the written findings that will be the basis for the written determination regarding the presence and risk of toxic materials on the property by the Department of Toxic Substances Control or the regional board, whichever is applicable. As used in this subdivision, “hazardous materials” has the same meaning as contained in subdivision (d) of Section 25260 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 119.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous [37020. - 37025.]

37020.

(a) Nothing in this division authorizes or increases the authority of any state or local public agency to use eminent domain to acquire private property.

(b) Nothing in this division diminishes existing land or water rights held by easement holders in any property proposed for donation.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37021.

(a) If any property approved for acceptance pursuant to this division is later transferred by the donee, the use of the property shall be restricted by deed to the conservation purposes for which the property was contributed pursuant to the program. If the board determines that the conservation purposes for which the property was contributed can no longer be achieved due to significantly changed circumstances beyond the control of the donee that accepted the property, the proceeds of the sale shall be used by the donee that accepted the property to acquire land in California of equal or greater value and comparable public resources values, as determined by the board. The land acquired shall meet the criteria of Section 37015. Nothing in this division prohibits the transfer of donated property to a nonprofit organization that is qualified to manage the property for the purposes intended by this division, if the terms of this section are met. Any local government or nonprofit organization seeking to sell land pursuant to this subdivision shall first obtain the approval of the board.

(b) Other than as provided by subdivision (a), property approved for acceptance pursuant to this division shall be used only for purposes consistent with Section 37015.

(c) (1) If any unauthorized use is made of the property after the property is donated to a local government or nonprofit organization pursuant to this program, the local government or nonprofit organization shall seek to terminate the unauthorized use and restore the conservation benefits for which the property was contributed. If the board determines that the unauthorized use has not been terminated and the conservation benefits fully restored within a reasonable period of time, the fee title owner of the property shall pay to the state the greater of the following:

(A) The fair market value of the property based on appraisals when accepted by the board.

(B) The fair market value of the property based on appraisals at the time of and based on the unauthorized use of the property.

(2) The department that is the donee or the board may seek injunctive relief to prevent the unauthorized use of the property, or may assume ownership or management of the property to assure that it is used in the manner originally authorized.

(d) The board shall develop a process to monitor the uses of any land that a local government or nonprofit organization receives pursuant to this division in order to ensure those uses are in conformance with the purposes for which the property is accepted.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37022.

(a) Tax credits may be awarded pursuant to this division only if the amount of all lost revenue resulting from the award of tax credits is reimbursed by transfer to the General Fund of moneys that are not from the General Fund. Tax Credits shall not be awarded subsequent to the 2014–15 fiscal year without further statutory authorization.

(b) For purposes of this section, “moneys that are not from the General Fund” means any of the following:

(1) State bond funds as described in Section
 37032.

(2) State funds available for the purposes of this division, other than funds specified in Section 37014.

(3) Court settlements.

(4) Private or public donations.

(5) Local government funds of any type.

(6) Federal funds available for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 220, Sec. 3.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

37023.

The donee shall allow public access to the property to the extent that public access is consistent with the purposes for which the property is accepted. Before providing public access to the property, the donee shall develop a plan that minimizes the impact of public access on adjacent landowners in order to avoid infringement on the customary husbandry practices on adjacent or nearby agricultural or timber operations and that establishes a setback or buffer area, as necessary. This section does not require access to privately owned lands for which a conservation easement is contributed pursuant to this division unless the conservation easement provides for public access.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37024.

If the city, county, or city and county in which the property is located objects to acceptance of the property, the city, county, or city and county, as appropriate, may request the Director of Finance to disapprove the acceptance of the property. These objections may relate to the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s conservation and development policies and their general plans, the efficient use and delivery of infrastructure, and the potential loss of property tax revenue. The Director of Finance may disapprove acceptance after reviewing the objections of the city, county, or city and county. The Director of Finance shall provide a written explanation for his or her decision to the affected city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37025.

Any donee accepting property pursuant to the program shall own and maintain any setback or buffer area that may be necessary for the use of that property in accordance with this division, in order to avoid infringement on the customary husbandry practices on adjacent or nearby agricultural or timber operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Bond Funds [37030. - 37042.]

37030.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Current justifiable needs for the acquisition of property for environmental purposes substantially exceed state-approved bond funds available for these purposes.

(b) The Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Act of 2000 authorizes the acquisition of qualified property through donations eligible for a credit against the personal income or bank and corporation tax in an amount equal to 55 percent of the fair market value of any qualified contribution.

(c) Where property owners are able to utilize this tax credit, state acquisition costs are nearly halved.

(d) Authorizing the expenditure of bond funds to acquire property using these tax credits will significantly expand the acquisition power of existing bond funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37031.

(a) For bond provisions listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 37032, “purpose” means scheme and design.

(b) For bond provisions listed in paragraphs (4) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 37032, “purpose” means scope and effect.

(c) For bond funds eligible to be used under this chapter, pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (c) of Section 37032, if the bond act is passed by initiative, “purpose” shall be defined pursuant to subdivision (b), but if the bond act is not passed by initiative, “purpose” shall be defined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “property” means property as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 37002 that is acquired pursuant to this division using bond funds in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37032.

(a) If a department or local government identifies property that may be acquired pursuant to this division and determines that the acquisition would comply with the purpose of a bond provision listed in subdivision (c) and any applicable guidelines developed for that bond provision by the administering agency, and all of the requirements of this division are met and the department or local government acquires the property pursuant to this division, the department or local government may expend funds from the bond provision that have been appropriated, allocated, or awarded to it, to acquire the property using the tax credit provided by this division.

(b) The applicable bond provisions from which a department or local government may use bond funds to acquire property using the tax credit provided by this division do not include grants of bond funds distributed through a competitive process.

(c) The applicable bond provisions from which a department or local government may expend bond funds pursuant to subdivision (a) are the following:

(1) Section 5096.615.

(2) Subdivision (a) or (b), or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), of Section 5096.650.

(3) Funds under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5096.650 that are to be expended pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 31220.

(4) Section 79541 of the Water Code.

(5) Section 79542 of the Water Code.

(6) Section 79544 of the Water Code.

(7) Subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 79550 of the Water Code.

(8) Section 79565 of the Water Code.

(9) Section 79568 of the Water Code.

(10) Section 79570 of the Water Code.

(11) Section 79572 of the Water Code.

(12) Other bond funds, if the bond act specifies that its funds may be used for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37034.

(a) (1) If a department determines that property is available for acquisition by donation, and that the acquisition of the property would comply with the requirements of an applicable bond provision specified in subdivision (c) of Section 37032 and any applicable guidelines developed for that bond provision by the administering agency, and the department believes the acquisition of the property would comply with the requirements of this division, the department may request the prospective donor of the property to submit an application pursuant to Section 37010. If the prospective donor agrees to submit that application, the department may apply for approval of the donation pursuant to the requirements of this division.

(2) If a local government determines that property is available for acquisition by donation, and that the acquisition of the property would comply with the requirements of an applicable bond provision specified in subdivision (c) of Section 37032 and any applicable guidelines developed for that bond provision by the administering agency, and the local government believes that the acquisition of the property would comply with the requirements of this division, the local government may request the department that allocated to it the relevant bond funds to determine whether it agrees with the local government’s determinations and beliefs made pursuant to this paragraph. If the department agrees with the local government and gives its approval for the acquisition with bond funds that it has allocated to the local government, the local government may request the prospective donor of the property to submit an application pursuant to Section 37010. If the
 prospective donor agrees to submit the application, the local government may apply for approval of the donation pursuant to the requirements of this division.

(3) In addition to the requirements of Section 37011, the application shall include, and shall not be accepted if it does not include, a signed authorization by the donor, in a form and manner mutually agreeable to the board and the Franchise Tax Board, for the disclosure of the information necessary to make the payment as required by subdivision (b). For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, the signed authorization shall be the donor’s voluntary consent to the disclosure of the information.

(b) (1) If the board gives approval, the department or local government may acquire the property pursuant to this division. Through the process outlined in this section, the department
 shall reimburse the General Fund for the tax credit claimed pursuant to this chapter under Section 17053.30 or 23630 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by transferring bond funds identified under subdivision (c) of Section 37032 to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account, on the basis of information provided to the department under Section 37040 regarding credit claimed for a qualified contribution under Section 17053.30 or 23630 of the Revenue and Taxation Code in that tax year.

(2) If a local government applies directly to the board for acceptance of a qualified donation, the board may provide conditional approval for the local government to acquire the property pursuant to this division. Through the process outlined in this section, the local government shall reimburse the General Fund for the tax credit claimed pursuant to this chapter under Section 17053.30 or 23630 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by transferring
 funds in the full amount of the approved tax credit to the board for deposit into the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account. 

(3) (A) Upon approval by the board, and prior to the time the department, local government, or designated nonprofit organization receives the property, the department shall encumber bond funds identified under subdivision (c) of Section 37032 in an amount necessary to pay for the tax credit as provided in Section 17053.30 or 23630, as applicable, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) If a local government applies directly to the board for acceptance of a qualified donation, and the board provides conditional approval of the qualified donation, the local government shall have 60 days to transfer to the board the full amount of funds necessary to reimburse the General Fund. Upon receipt of the funds necessary to
 reimburse the General Fund, the board shall provide the donor and the local government with a notice of final approval of the tax credit. A tax credit is not approved until such time as the donor and local government receive a final notification from the board that sufficient funds have been received to reimburse the General Fund for the loss of revenue associated with the tax credit.

(C) The acquisition agreement or any other document that clearly delineates the commitment pursuant to this division shall be the only documentation required for the department to encumber the bond funds as required by this paragraph.

(D) Except as prohibited by the relevant bond act, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, the encumbrance shall be available without regard to fiscal years to allow payments to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit
 Reimbursement Account for the tax credit due the donor of the property under Section 17053.30 or 23630, as applicable, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the board information pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19560 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on tax credits claimed. The information shall include the tax year for which the credit was claimed. The board shall provide the information required by Section 37040 to the relevant department. Upon notification that a qualified tax credit has been claimed, the department, pursuant to paragraph (1), shall transfer bond funds in the amount of the tax credit for that tax year to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account within 60 days of receipt of the notification. The department shall notify the board of this transfer.

(5) The board shall forward the information it
 receives pursuant to paragraph (4) to the Controller and the Department of Finance, which shall use the information for the purpose of attributing the budgetary impact of the credit and bond fund transfer to the appropriate tax and fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 220, Sec. 4.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

37035.

(a) (1) If a department determines that a designated nonprofit organization, in lieu of the department, should accept property that the department applies to acquire pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034, and determines that the acceptance by the designated nonprofit organization would comply with the purpose of the applicable bond provision specified in subdivision (c) of Section 37032, the department may, upon that determination and upon making the determinations and having the belief required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034, apply to acquire the property for that designated nonprofit organization pursuant to this division. The department shall not make that application until the prospective donor agrees to submit an
 application pursuant to Section 37010 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034 and the designated nonprofit organization agrees to accept the property if it is acquired pursuant to this division.

(2) If a local government determines that a designated nonprofit organization, in lieu of the local government, should accept property that the local government applies to acquire pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034, and determines that the acceptance by the designated nonprofit organization would comply with the purpose of the applicable bond provision specified in subdivision (c) of Section 37032, the local government may, upon that determination and making the determinations and having the belief required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034, request the department that allocated to it the relevant bond funds to determine whether it agrees with the local government’s determinations made pursuant
 to this paragraph. If the department agrees with the local government, gives its approval for the designated nonprofit organization’s acceptance of the property, and gives its approval pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034, the local government may apply to acquire the property for that designated nonprofit organization pursuant to this division. The local government shall not make that application until the prospective donor agrees to submit an application pursuant to Section 37010 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 37034 and the designated nonprofit organization agrees to accept the property if it is acquired pursuant to this division.

(b) If a department or local government applies for a designated nonprofit organization to acquire property, pursuant to subdivision (a), the department and donor, and the local government, if applicable, shall comply with all requirements of this division that apply to the
 department and donor, and to the local government, if applicable, when the department or local government otherwise applies to acquire property pursuant to this division.

(c) If a local government applies for a designated nonprofit organization to acquire and accept donated property, the local government shall comply with all requirements of this division that apply to the local government transferring funds to the board necessary to reimburse the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 220, Sec. 5.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

37036.

(a) The Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account is established in the General Fund to receive moneys paid pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Moneys in the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account shall be used only to reimburse the General Fund as determined by the departments pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 37034.

(c) Upon receipt of funds in the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account and notification to the Legislature, the Controller shall transfer, within 60 days of the notification, the balance of the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account to the General Fund.

(d) The moneys in the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account may not be loaned to another fund and may not accrue interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

37038.

If the board is the department that receives moneys pursuant to any of the bond provisions listed in subdivision (c) of Section 37032 and the board wishes to use those bond funds to acquire property pursuant to this division using those bond funds, the board shall make separate determinations regarding whether the acquisition of that property would comply with the purpose of the applicable bond provision and any applicable guidelines developed for that bond provision by the administering agency, and whether the acquisition would comply with the requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37040.

(a) The board shall notify the Controller, the Treasurer, and the relevant department of the information listed in subdivision (b) after the board receives notification from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 19560 of the Revenue and Taxation Code that a person is claiming a tax credit under this chapter.

(b) The board shall provide all of the following information:

(1) The bond fund and specific provision of the bond act under which the credit is being claimed.

(2) The project name, appropriation under which the credit was encumbered, and, if applicable, the related local government.

(3) The department that will transfer the appropriate bond funds to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Reimbursement Account.

(4) The amount of the tax credit for that tax year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37042.

The Legislature finds and declares that the expenditure of bond funds pursuant to this chapter does not constitute the use of bond proceeds or other indebtedness to pay a year-end state budget deficit, as prohibited by subdivision (c) of Section 1.3 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 30. WASTE MANAGEMENT [40000. - 49654.]



PART 1. INTEGRATED WASTE MANAGEMENT [40000. - 40520.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [40000. - 40063.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Declarations [40000. - 40004.]

40000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In 1988, Californians disposed of over 38 million tons of solid waste, an amount that is expected to grow if existing solid waste policies are continued. This amounts to more than 1,500 pounds of waste per person living in the state, more than any other state in the country and over twice the per-capita rate of most other industrialized countries.

(b) Over 90 percent of California’s solid waste currently is disposed of in landfills, some of which pose a threat to groundwater, air quality, and public health.

(c) While California will exhaust most of its remaining landfill space by the mid-1990s, there presently is no coherent state policy to ensure that the state’s solid waste is managed in an effective and environmentally sound manner for the remainder of the 20th century and beyond.

(d) The amount of solid waste generated in the state coupled with diminishing landfill space and potential adverse environmental impacts from landfilling constitutes an urgent need for state and local agencies to enact and implement an aggressive new integrated waste management program.

(e) The reduction, recycling, or reuse of solid waste generated in the state will, in addition to preserving landfill capacity in California, serve to conserve water, energy, and other natural resources within this state, and to protect the state’s environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 300.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

40001.

(a) The Legislature declares that the responsibility for solid waste management is a shared responsibility between the state and local governments. The state shall exercise its legal authority in a manner that ensures an effective and coordinated approach to the safe management of all solid waste generated within the state and shall oversee the design and implementation of local integrated waste management plans.

(b) The Legislature further declares that it is the policy of the state to assist local governments in minimizing duplication of effort, and in minimizing the costs incurred, in implementing this division through the development of regional cooperative efforts and other mechanisms which comply with this division. 

(c) The Legislature further declares that market development is the key to successful and cost-effective implementation of the 25-percent and 50-percent diversion requirements required pursuant to Section 41780, and that the state must take a leadership role, pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 42000) of Part 3, in encouraging the expansion of markets for recycled products by working cooperatively with the public, private, and nonprofit sectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40002.

(a) As an essential part of the state’s comprehensive program for solid waste management, and for the preservation of health and safety, and the well-being of the public, the Legislature declares that it is in the public interest for the state, as sovereign, to authorize and require local agencies, as subdivisions of the state, to make adequate provision for solid waste handling, both within their respective jurisdictions and in response to regional needs consistent with the policies, standards, and requirements of this division and all regulations adopted pursuant to this division.
 This division, which authorizes and requires local agencies to provide adequate solid waste handling and services, and the actions of local agencies taken pursuant to this division, are intended to implement this state policy.

(b) The Legislature further declares that restrictions on the disposal of solid
 waste that discriminate on the basis of the place of origin of the waste are an obstacle to, and conflict with, statewide and regional policies to ensure adequate and appropriate capacity for solid waste disposal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   (AB 845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

40003.

Nothing in this division abrogates, limits, or otherwise affects the duties of the Department of Conservation under the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act, Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

40004.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Solid waste diversion and disposal reduction require the availability of adequate solid waste processing and composting capacity.

(2) The existing network of public and private solid waste processing and composting facilities provides a net environmental benefit to the communities served, and represents a valuable asset and resource of this state, one that must be sustained and expanded to provide the additional solid waste processing capacity that will be required to achieve the additional solid waste diversion targets expressed in Section 41780.01 and the commercial solid
 waste recycling requirement expressed in Section 42649.

(3) The provisions in existing law that confer broad discretion on local agencies to determine aspects of solid waste handling that are of local concern have significantly contributed to the statewide diversion rate exceeding 50 percent, and further progress toward decreasing solid waste disposal requires that this essential element of local control be preserved.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the development of the additional solid waste processing and composting capacity that is needed to meet state objectives for decreasing solid waste disposal by identifying incentives for local governments to locate and approve new or expanded facilities that meet and exceed their capacity needs, and to recognize local agencies that make significant contributions to the state’s overall solid waste reduction and
 recycling objectives through the siting of facilities for the processing and composting of materials diverted from the solid waste stream.

(c) By setting new commercial solid waste recycling requirements in Section 42649, the Legislature does not intend to limit a right afforded to local governments pursuant to Section 40059, or to modify or abrogate in any manner the rights of a local government or solid waste enterprise with regard to a solid waste handling franchise or contract.
